Utah statutes.
76-3-203.   Felony conviction -- Indeterminate term of imprisonment.

A person who has been convicted of a felony may be sentenced to imprisonment for an indeterminate term as follows:

(1)  In the case of a felony of the first degree, unless the statute provides otherwise, for a term of not less than five years and which may be for life.

(2)  In the case of a felony of the second degree, unless the statute provides otherwise, for a term of not less than one year nor more than 15 years.

(3)  In the case of a felony of the third degree, unless the statute provides otherwise, for a term not to exceed five years.



Amended by Chapter 148, 2003 General Session

